ru: Техника игры на рейнстике: Переворот; Несколько техник; Перекатывание по поверхности; Вращение; Тряска / Встряхивание; Медленный наклон; Другое
cs: Technika hry na dešťovou hůlku: Převracení; Kombinované techniky; Kutálení po povrchu; Otáčení/točení; Třepání; Pomalé naklánění; Ostatní
ja: レインスティックの演奏テクニック: 反転/フリップ; マルチテクニック; 表面を転がす; 回転/スピン; 振る; ゆっくり傾ける; その他
ko: 레인스틱 연주 기법: 뒤집기/반전; 다중 기법; 표면에서 굴리기; 돌리기/회전; 흔들기; 천천히 기울이기; 기타
zh-CN: 雨声器演奏方式: 翻转/倒置; 多种技巧; 在表面滚动; 旋转/打转; 摇晃; 缓慢倾斜; 其他
fi: Sadeputken soittotekniikka: Kääntö ympäri; Monitekniikka; Vieritys pinnalla; Pyöritys; Ravistus; Hidas kallistus; Muu
de: Spieltechnik des Regenstabs: Umkehren/Umdrehen; Mehrere Techniken; Auf Oberfläche rollen; Drehen/Rotieren; Schütteln; Langsames Neigen; Sonstige
hr-HR: Tehnika sviranja kišnim štapićem: Okretanje; Više tehnika; Kotrljanje po površini; Rotiranje/vrtnja; Trešenje; Sporo naginjanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tehnica de joc cu baston de ploaie: Inversare/întoarcere; Multi-tehnică; Rostogolire pe suprafață; Rotire/învârtire; Agitare; Înclinare lentă; Altele
tr: Rainstick çalma tekniği: Ters çevirme/döndürme; Çoklu teknik; Yüzeyde yuvarlama; Döndürme/çevirme; Sallama; Yavaşça eğme; Diğer
nl: Rainstick speeltechniek: Omkeren/kantelen; Meerdere technieken; Rollen over oppervlak; Draaien/spinnen; Schudden; Langzaam kantelen; Overig
sk-SK: Technika hry na dažďovú palicu: Preklápanie/obracanie; Kombinovaná technika; Gúľanie po povrchu; Otáčanie/rotácia; Trasenie; Pomalé nakláňanie; Iné
vi: Kỹ thuật chơi nhạc cụ tạo tiếng mưa (rainstick): Đảo ngược/lật; Đa kỹ thuật; Lăn trên bề mặt; Xoay/vặn; Lắc; Nghiêng chậm; Khác
pt-BR: Técnica de execução do pau de chuva: Inverter/virar; Multitécnica; Rolar na superfície; Girar/rodar; Agitar; Inclinação lenta; Outros
fr: Technique de jeu du bâton de pluie: Renverser/retourner; Multi-technique; Rouler sur une surface; Faire tourner/pivoter; Secouer; Incliner lentement; Autre
pl: Technika gry Rainstickiem: Odwracanie; Wielotechnikowy; Toczenie po powierzchni; Obracanie; Potrząsanie; Powolne przechylanie; Inne
en: Rainstick playing technique: Invert/flip; Multi-technique; Roll on surface; Rotate/spin; Shake; Slow tilt; Other
sv: Rainstick-spelteknik: Vänd upp och ner; Flera tekniker; Rulla på underlag; Rotera/snurra; Skaka; Luta långsamt; Övrigt
zh-TW: 雨聲器演奏技巧: 倒轉/翻轉; 多種技巧; 表面滾動; 旋轉/轉動; 搖晃; 緩慢傾斜; 其他
th: เทคนิคการเล่นเรนสติ๊ก: คว่ำ/พลิก; หลายเทคนิค; กลิ้งบนพื้นผิว; หมุน/ปั่น; เขย่า; เอียงช้าๆ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Техника на свирене с дъждовна пръчка: Обръщане/превъртане; Множество техники; Търкаляне по повърхност; Въртене/завъртане; Разклащане; Бавно накланяне; Други
nb: Teknikk for spilling av regnstav: Snu/vende; Flerteknikk; Rull på overflate; Roter/snurr; Rist; Sakte vipping; Annet
sl-SI: Tehnika igranja na dežno palico: Obračanje/obrat; Več tehnik; Kotaljenje po površini; Vrtenje; Tresenje; Počasen nagib; Drugo
es: Técnica para tocar el palo de lluvia: Invertir/voltear; Multitécnica; Rodar sobre superficie; Girar/rotar; Agitar; Inclinación lenta; Otro
pt-PT: Técnica de execução do bastão de chuva: Inverter/virar; Várias técnicas; Rolar sobre a superfície; Rodar/girar; Agitar; Inclinação lenta; Outro
it: Tecnica di gioco del bastone della pioggia: Invertire/capovolgere; Multitecnica; Rotolamento sulla superficie; Ruotare/girare; Scuotere; Inclinare lentamente; Altro
da: Teknik til at spille på regnmager: Vend på hovedet; Flere teknikker; Rul på overflade; Roter/spin; Ryst; Langsom vipning; Andet
el: Τεχνική χρήσης του rainstick: Αναστροφή/γύρισμα; Πολλαπλών τεχνικών; Κύλιση σε επιφάνεια; Περιστροφή/γύρισμα; Ανακίνηση; Αργή κλίση; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lietaus lazdelės grojimo technika: Apversti; Kelių metodų; Ridenti paviršiumi; Sukti; Kratyti; Lėtai pakreipti; Kita
hu: Esőbot játéktechnikája: Megfordítás/átfordítás; Többféle technika; Gördítés felületen; Forgatás/pörgetés; Rázás; Lassú döntés; Egyéb